Hawaii statutes.
§415A-12 Professional relationships;
privileged communications. (a) The relationship between an individual
performing professional services as an employee of a professional corporation
and a client or patient shall be the same as if the individual performed the
services as a sole practitioner.

(b) The relationship between a professional
corporation performing professional services and the client or patient shall be
the same as between the client or patient and the individual performing the
services.

(c) Any privilege applicable to communications
between a person rendering professional services and the person receiving the
services recognized under the laws of this State, whether statutory or deriving
from common law, shall remain inviolate and shall extend to a professional
corporation and its employees in all cases in which it shall be applicable to
communications between an individual rendering professional services on behalf
of the corporation and the person receiving the services. [L 1985, c 259, pt of
§1; am L 1987, c 135, §118]

Cross References

Common law of the State, see §1-1.

Privileges under Hawaii Rules of Evidence, see §626-1,
article V.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next